District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-301.05c

Policy for contracting out government services.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 105c
as added Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 501(b), 43 DCR 5
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-274, § 4, 48 DCR 1654

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1181.5c.